Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.42.105

Power to make loans and to guarantee obligations.

An approved branch of an alien bank shall have the same power to make loans and guarantee obligations as a state bank chartered pursuant to this title: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the base for computing the applicable loan limitation shall be the entire capital and surplus of the alien bank. The director may adopt rules limiting the amount of loans to full-time employees of the branch.

[ 2014 c 37 s 215; 1994 c 92 s 87; 1982 c 95 s 4. Formerly RCW 30.42.105.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1982 c 95: See note following RCW 30A.42.070.